Illinois, session 104th, SB93.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act is 5amended by changing Section 5 and by adding Section 13.5 as 6follows: 7    (410 ILCS 620/5)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 505)8    Sec. 5. Penalties. 9    (a) A person who violates any of the provisions of this 10Act, other than Sections 3.22, and 6, and 13.5, is guilty of a 11Class C misdemeanor; but if the violation is committed after a 12conviction of such person under this Section has become final, 13the person shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. A person 14who violates the provisions of Section 6 of this Act is guilty 15of a Class A misdemeanor; but if the violation is committed 16after a conviction of such person under this Section has 17become final, the person shall be guilty of a Class 4 felony.18    (b) No person is subject to the penalties of subsection 19(a) of this Section for (1) violating Section 3.1 or 3.3 if he 20establishes a guaranty or undertaking signed by and containing 21the name and address of the person residing in the State of 22Illinois from whom he received the article in good faith, to 23the effect that the article is not adulterated within the   SB0093 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 03311 BDA 13333 b1meaning of this Act, designating this Act; or (2) for having 2violated clause (2) of Section 3.16 if such person acted in 3good faith and had no reason to believe that the use of the 4punch, die, plate, stone or other thing involved would result 5in a drug being a counterfeit drug, or for having violated 6clause (3) of Section 3.16 if the person doing the act or 7causing it to be done acted in good faith and had no reason to 8believe that the drug was a counterfeit drug.9    (c) No publisher, radio-broadcast licensee, agency or 10medium for the dissemination of an advertisement, except the 11manufacturer, packer, distributor or seller of the article to 12which a false advertisement relates is liable under this 13Section for the dissemination of such false advertisement 14unless he has refused on the request of the Director to furnish 15the Director the name and post office address of the 16manufacturer, packer, distributor, seller or advertising 17agency residing in the State of Illinois who causes him to 18disseminate such advertisement.19    (d) No person shall be subject to the penalties of 20subsection (a) of this Section for a violation of Section 3 21involving misbranded food if the violation exists solely 22because the food is misbranded under subsection (c) of Section 2311 because of its advertising, and no person shall be subject 24to the penalties of subsection (a) of this Section for such a 25violation unless the violation is committed with the intent to 26defraud or mislead.  SB0093 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 03311 BDA 13333 b1(Source: P.A. 97-872, eff. 7-31-12.) 2    (410 ILCS 620/13.5 new)3    Sec. 13.5. Prohibited food additives.4    (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, a person or entity shall 5not manufacture a food product for human consumption that 6contains any of the following substances:7        (1) Potassium bromate (Chemical Abstract Services 8    number 7758-01-2); or 9        (2) Propylparaben (Chemical Abstract Services number 10    94-13-3). 11    (b) Beginning January 1, 2028, a person or entity shall 12not sell, deliver, distribute, hold, or offer for sale a food 13product for human consumption that contains any of the 14substances listed in paragraphs (1) through (4) of subsection 15(a).16    (c) A person or entity that violates subsection (a) or (b) 17shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for a 18first violation and not to exceed $10,000 for each subsequent 19violation. A violation of this Section may be enforced by the 20Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the county in 21which the violation occurred.22    (d) This Section does not impair or impede any other 23rights, causes of action, claims, or defenses available under 24any other law. The remedies provided in this Section are 25cumulative with any other remedies available under any other   SB0093 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 03311 BDA 13333 b1law.